Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1661XS (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. 336 Section 1. Section 155A.46, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0d. A pharmacist may, pursuant to statewide 3 protocols developed by the board in consultation with the 4 department of health and human services and consistent with 5 subsection 3, order and dispense self-administered hormonal 6 contraceptives to patients. For the purposes of this 7 paragraph, âself-administered hormonal contraceptiveâ means 8 a self-administered hormonal contraceptive that is approved 9 by the United States food and drug administration to prevent 10 pregnancy. 11